North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24 Aid to Aged, Blind or Disabled Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 513, § 1]

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 513, S.L. 1979, provides:

“Rights existing and vested or instruments executed under sections 50-24-13, 50-24-15, 50-24-30, 50-24-33, 50-24-34, and 50-24-38 prior to July 1, 1979, shall continue to be effective until their expiration according to their own terms or by force of law”.